Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1398.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 36, chapter 29, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2929.01, to read: START_STATUTE36-2929.01. Redeterminations; eligibility verification; annual report A. Beginning January 1, 2027, notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, at least every six months the administration shall determine the continued eligibility of any adult who is at least twenty-one years of age.  The administration shall verify eligibility using available data. B. On or before December 1 of each year, the administration shall annually report to the joint legislative budget committee, the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the House of representatives and the members of the senate and house of representatives health and human services committees, or their successor committees, all of the following: 1. The number of new eligibility applications for enrollment in the system that were received in the previous contract year. 2. The number of eligibility verifications for enrollment in the system that were completed in the previous contract year. 3. The number of applications received in the previous contract year for enrollment in a program administered by the administration that requires an asset verification as part of the eligibility process. 4. The number of asset verifications that were completed in the previous contract year. END_STATUTE